ru: Номинальный размер автомобильного коаксиального динамика: 10 дюймов; 3,5 дюйма; 4 дюйма; 4x6 дюймов; 5,25 дюйма; 5x7 дюймов; 6,5 дюйма; 6,75 дюйма; 6x8 дюймов; 6x9 дюймов; 7 дюймов; 8 дюймов; 8x10 дюймов; Другое
tr: Araç koaksiyel hoparlör nominal boyutu: 10 inç; 3,5 inç; 4 inç; 4x6 inç; 5,25 inç; 5x7 inç; 6,5 inç; 6,75 inç; 6x8 inç; 6x9 inç; 7 inç; 8 inç; 8x10 inç; Diğer
fr: Dimension nominale du haut-parleur coaxial automobile: 10 po; 3,5 po; 4 po; 4x6 po; 5,25 po; 5x7 po; 6,5 po; 6,75 po; 6x8 po; 6x9 po; 7 po; 8 po; 8x10 po; Autre
sv: Nominell storlek på koaxialhögtalare i fordon: 10 tum; 3,5 tum; 4 tum; 4x6 tum; 5,25 tum; 5x7 tum; 6,5 tum; 6,75 tum; 6x8 tum; 6x9 tum; 7 tum; 8 tum; 8x10 tum; Övrigt
th: ขนาดระบุของลำโพงโคแอกเซียลในรถยนต์: 10 นิ้ว; 3.5 นิ้ว; 4 นิ้ว; 4x6 นิ้ว; 5.25 นิ้ว; 5x7 นิ้ว; 6.5 นิ้ว; 6.75 นิ้ว; 6x8 นิ้ว; 6x9 นิ้ว; 7 นิ้ว; 8 นิ้ว; 8x10 นิ้ว; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės koaksialinio garsiakalbio nominalus dydis: 10 col.; 3,5 col.; 4 col.; 4x6 col.; 5,25 col.; 5x7 col.; 6,5 col.; 6,75 col.; 6x8 col.; 6x9 col.; 7 col.; 8 col.; 8x10 col.; Kita
ko: 차량용 동축 스피커 공칭 사이즈: 10인치; 3.5인치; 4인치; 4x6인치; 5.25인치; 5x7인치; 6.5인치; 6.75인치; 6x8인치; 6x9인치; 7인치; 8인치; 8x10인치; 기타
fi: Ajoneuvon koaksiaalikaiuttimen nimellinen koko: 10 in; 3,5 in; 4 in; 4 × 6 in; 5,25 in; 5 × 7 in; 6,5 in; 6,75 in; 6 × 8 in; 6 × 9 in; 7 in; 8 in; 8 × 10 in; Muu
pt-BR: Alto-falante coaxial veicular tamanho nominal: 10 pol.; 3,5 pol.; 4 pol.; 4x6 pol.; 5,25 pol.; 5x7 pol.; 6,5 pol.; 6,75 pol.; 6x8 pol.; 6x9 pol.; 7 pol.; 8 pol.; 8x10 pol.; Outro
sk-SK: Nominálna veľkosť koaxiálneho reproduktora vozidla: 10 in; 3,5 in; 4 in; 4x6 in; 5,25 in; 5x7 in; 6,5 in; 6,75 in; 6x8 in; 6x9 in; 7 in; 8 in; 8x10 in; Iné
bg-BG: Номинален размер на коаксиален автомобилен говорител: 10 инча; 3,5 инча; 4 инча; 4x6 инча; 5,25 инча; 5x7 инча; 6,5 инча; 6,75 инча; 6x8 инча; 6x9 инча; 7 инча; 8 инча; 8x10 инча; Друго
ro-RO: Dimensiunea nominală a difuzorului coaxial auto: 10 in; 3,5 in; 4 in; 4x6 in; 5,25 in; 5x7 in; 6,5 in; 6,75 in; 6x8 in; 6x9 in; 7 in; 8 in; 8x10 in; Altele
it: Dimensioni nominali dell'altoparlante coassiale del veicolo: 10 pollici; 3,5 pollici; 4 pollici; 4x6 pollici; 5,25 pollici; 5x7 pollici; 6,5 pollici; 6,75 pollici; 6x8 pollici; 6x9 pollici; 7 pollici; 8 pollici; 8x10 pollici; Altro
en: Vehicle coaxial speaker nominal size: 10 in; 3.5 in; 4 in; 4x6 in; 5.25 in; 5x7 in; 6.5 in; 6.75 in; 6x8 in; 6x9 in; 7 in; 8 in; 8x10 in; Other
es: Tamaño nominal del altavoz coaxial para vehículos: 10 pulgadas; 3,5 pulgadas; 4 pulgadas; 4x6 pulgadas; 5,25 pulgadas; 5x7 pulgadas; 6,5 pulgadas; 6,75 pulgadas; 6x8 pulgadas; 6x9 pulgadas; 7 pulgadas; 8 pulgadas; 8x10 pulgadas; Otro
hu: Jármű koaxiális hangszórójának névleges mérete: 10 hüvelyk; 3,5 hüvelyk; 4 hüvelyk; 4×6 hüvelyk; 5,25 hüvelyk; 5×7 hüvelyk; 6,5 hüvelyk; 6,75 hüvelyk; 6×8 hüvelyk; 6×9 hüvelyk; 7 hüvelyk; 8 hüvelyk; 8×10 hüvelyk; Egyéb
sl-SI: Nominalna velikost koaksialnega zvočnika za vozilo: 10 palcev; 3,5 palca; 4 palci; 4 x 6 palcev; 5,25 palca; 5 x 7 palcev; 6,5 palca; 6,75 palca; 6 x 8 palcev; 6 x 9 palcev; 7 palcev; 8 palcev; 8 x 10 palcev; Drugo
vi: Kích thước danh nghĩa loa đồng trục xe hơi: 10 in; 3,5 in; 4 in; 4x6 in; 5,25 in; 5x7 in; 6,5 in; 6,75 in; 6x8 in; 6x9 in; 7 in; 8 in; 8x10 in; Khác
hr-HR: Nominalna veličina koaksijalnog zvučnika u vozilu: 10 in; 3,5 in; 4 in; 4x6 in; 5,25 in; 5x7 in; 6,5 in; 6,75 in; 6x8 in; 6x9 in; 7 in; 8 in; 8x10 in; Ostalo
nl: Voertuig coaxiale luidspreker nominale maat: 10 inch; 3,5 inch; 4 inch; 4 x 6 inch; 5,25 inch; 5 x 7 inch; 6,5 inch; 6,75 inch; 6 x 8 inch; 6 x 9 inch; 7 inch; 8 inch; 8 x 10 inch; Overig
pt-PT: Tamanho nominal do altifalante coaxial para veículo: 10 pol.; 3,5 pol.; 4 pol.; 4x6 pol.; 5,25 pol.; 5x7 pol.; 6,5 pol.; 6,75 pol.; 6x8 pol.; 6x9 pol.; 7 pol.; 8 pol.; 8x10 pol.; Outro
zh-CN: 车辆同轴扬声器标称尺寸: 10 英寸; 3.5 英寸; 4 英寸; 4x6 英寸; 5.25 英寸; 5x7 英寸; 6.5 英寸; 6.75 英寸; 6x8 英寸; 6x9 英寸; 7 英寸; 8 英寸; 8x10 英寸; 其他
zh-TW: 車輛同軸揚聲器標稱尺寸: 10 吋; 3.5 吋; 4 吋; 4x6 吋; 5.25 吋; 5x7 吋; 6.5 吋; 6.75 吋; 6x8 吋; 6x9 吋; 7 吋; 8 吋; 8x10 吋; 其他
cs: Jmenovitá velikost koaxiálního reproduktoru vozidla: 10 palců; 3,5 palce; 4 palce; 4 x 6 palců; 5,25 palce; 5 x 7 palců; 6,5 palce; 6,75 palce; 6 x 8 palců; 6 x 9 palců; 7 palců; 8 palců; 8 x 10 palců; Jiné
nb: Nominell størrelse på koaksialhøyttaler i kjøretøy: 10 tommer; 3,5 tommer; 4 tommer; 4x6 tommer; 5,25 tommer; 5x7 tommer; 6,5 tommer; 6,75 tommer; 6x8 tommer; 6x9 tommer; 7 tommer; 8 tommer; 8x10 tommer; Annet
de: Nenngröße des Fahrzeug-Koaxiallautsprechers: 10 Zoll; 3,5 Zoll; 4 Zoll; 4x6 Zoll; 5,25 Zoll; 5x7 Zoll; 6,5 Zoll; 6,75 Zoll; 6x8 Zoll; 6x9 Zoll; 7 Zoll; 8 Zoll; 8x10 Zoll; Sonstiges
ja: 車両用同軸スピーカー公称サイズ: 10 インチ; 3.5 インチ; 4 インチ; 4x6 インチ; 5.25 インチ; 5x7 インチ; 6.5 インチ; 6.75 インチ; 6x8 インチ; 6x9 インチ; 7 インチ; 8 インチ; 8x10 インチ; その他
da: Nominel størrelse for koaksialhøjttaler til køretøj: 10 in; 3,5 in; 4 in; 4x6 in; 5,25 in; 5x7 in; 6,5 in; 6,75 in; 6x8 in; 6x9 in; 7 in; 8 in; 8x10 in; Andet
pl: Nominalny rozmiar samochodowego głośnika współosiowego: 10 cali; 3,5 cala; 4 cale; 4x6 cali; 5,25 cala; 5x7 cali; 6,5 cala; 6,75 cala; 6x8 cali; 6x9 cali; 7 cali; 8 cali; 8x10 cali; Inne
el: Ονομαστικό μέγεθος ομοαξονικού ηχείου οχήματος: 10 in; 3,5 in; 4 in; 4x6 in; 5,25 in; 5x7 in; 6,5 in; 6,75 in; 6x8 in; 6x9 in; 7 in; 8 in; 8x10 in; Άλλο